Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 2. School Buildings.

§ 22.1-135.
Health and decency.

No public school shall be allowed in any building which is not in such condition and provided with such conveniences as are required by a due regard for decency and health.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-97, 22-157; 1954, c. 291; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1968, c. 501; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 161; 1975, cc. 308, 328; 1978, c. 430; 1980, c. 559.

Law Review.

For note on AIDS in the public schools, see 29 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 881 (1988).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Limitation of actions. —

Where a student sued a school board and its employees, alleging gross negligence and fraud based on injuries he allegedly suffered due to toxic mold infestation of an elementary school, as his diagnosis of mold-related illness and the attribution of his illness to mold infestation at the school did not occur until less than two years before the suit was filed, the suit was not time-barred. Simpson v. Thorsen, 84 Va. Cir. 252, 2012 Va. Cir. LEXIS 7 (Suffolk Jan. 31, 2012).

School board and its employees did not enjoy sovereign immunity as to a student’s gross negligence claims based on injuries he allegedly suffered due to toxic mold infestation of an elementary school, as the board owed a duty to him to operate the school to which he was assigned, and the board’s employees had a direct responsibility to the board for maintenance of the facilities, and owed duties to the student that were derivative of their duties to the board. Simpson v. Thorsen, 84 Va. Cir. 252, 2012 Va. Cir. LEXIS 7 (Suffolk Jan. 31, 2012).

Sovereign immunity. —

As school building maintenance was designated a governmental duty under § 22.1-135 et seq., a school board and its employees enjoyed sovereign immunity as to a student’s claims of simple negligence based on injuries he allegedly suffered due to toxic mold infestation of an elementary school. Simpson v. Thorsen, 84 Va. Cir. 252, 2012 Va. Cir. LEXIS 7 (Suffolk Jan. 31, 2012).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Physical condition of schools. —

Remedies for inequality in public education, whether arising from poor school physical plant conditions or otherwise, are available under the mandates of the Equal Protection Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment to the U.S. Constitution; the Civil Rights Act of 1964; the Equal Educational Opportunities Act of 1974; and Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972, which collectively prohibit discrimination on the basis of race and sex. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable William M. Stanley, Member, Senate of Virginia, 18-046, 2019 Va. AG LEXIS 2 (1/4/19).

The general assembly has enacted state laws that make local school boards primarily responsible for constructing and renovating school buildings in Virginia. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable William M. Stanley, Member, Senate of Virginia, 18-046, 2019 Va. AG LEXIS 2 (1/4/19).

§ 22.1-135.1.
Potable water; lead testing.

Each local school board shall develop and implement a plan to test and, if necessary, remediate potable water from sources identified by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency as high priority for testing, including bubbler-style and cooler-style drinking fountains, cafeteria or kitchen taps, classroom combination sinks and drinking fountains, and sinks known to be or visibly used for consumption. Such plan shall be consistent with guidance published by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency or the Department of Health. The local school board shall give priority in the testing plan to schools whose school building was constructed, in whole or in part, before 1986. Each local school board shall submit such testing plan and report the results of any such test to the Department of Health. Each local school board shall take all steps necessary to notify parents if testing results indicate lead contamination that exceeds 10 parts per billion.

History.

2017, c. 628; 2020, cc. 293, 884.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 293 and 884 are identical, and inserted the second sentence and added the last two sentences.

§ 22.1-136.
Duty of division superintendent to close buildings.

When a public school building appears to the division superintendent to be unfit for occupancy, it shall be his duty to close the same and immediately to give notice thereof in writing to the members of the school board. No public school shall be held therein nor shall any state or local funds be applied to support any school in such building until the division superintendent shall certify in writing to the school board that he is satisfied with the condition of such building and with the appliances pertaining thereto.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-97, 22-158; 1954, c. 291; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1968, c. 501; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 161; 1975, cc. 308, 328; 1978, c. 430; 1980, c. 559.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Physical condition of schools. —

Remedies for inequality in public education, whether arising from poor school physical plant conditions or otherwise, are available under the mandates of the Equal Protection Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment to the U.S. Constitution; the Civil Rights Act of 1964; the Equal Educational Opportunities Act of 1974; and Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972, which collectively prohibit discrimination on the basis of race and sex. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable William M. Stanley, Member, Senate of Virginia, 18-046, 2019 Va. AG LEXIS 2 (1/4/19).

The general assembly has enacted state laws that make local school boards primarily responsible for constructing and renovating school buildings in Virginia. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable William M. Stanley, Member, Senate of Virginia, 18-046, 2019 Va. AG LEXIS 2 (1/4/19).

§ 22.1-137.
Fire drills.

In every public school there shall be a fire drill at least twice during the first 20 school days of each school session, in order that pupils may be thoroughly practiced in such drills. Every public school shall hold at least two additional fire drills during the remainder of the school session.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-156; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 163; 1980, c. 559; 1993, c. 212; 2016, c. 524.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 524 rewrote the section, which read: “In every public school there shall be a fire drill at least once every week during the first twenty school days of each school session, and more often if necessary, in order that pupils may be thoroughly practiced in such drills. During the remainder of the school session fire drills shall be held at least monthly.”

§ 22.1-137.1.
Tornado drills.

In every public school there shall be at least one tornado drill every school year, in order that students may be thoroughly practiced in such drills.

History.

2001, c. 841.

§ 22.1-137.2.
Lock-down drills.

In every public school there shall be a lock-down drill at least once during the first 20 school days of each school session, in order that students and teachers may be thoroughly practiced in such drills. Every public school shall hold at least one additional lock-down drill after the first 60 days of the school session. Every public school shall provide the parents of enrolled students with at least 24 hours’ notice before the school conducts any lock-down drill, provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be construed to require such notice to include the exact date and time of the lock-down drill.

Pre-kindergarten and kindergarten students shall be exempt from mandatory participation in lock-down drills during the first 60 days of the school session. Local school boards shall develop policies to implement such exemption. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subsection, each pre-kindergarten and kindergarten student shall participate in each lock-down drill after the first 60 days of each school session.

History.

2013, c. 609; 2016, c. 524; 2020, cc. 378, 1040; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 26.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 524 rewrote the first two sentences, which read: “In every public school there shall be at least two lock-down drills every school year, in order that students may be thoroughly practiced in such drills. One lock-down drill shall be completed in September of each school year and one lock-down drill shall be completed in January of each school year.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 378 added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1040, in subsection A in the first sentence, inserted “and teachers”; in the second sentence, substituted “one additional lock-down drill after the first 60 days” for “two additional lock-down drills during the remainder” and deleted the former third sentence, which read, “Lock-down plans and drills shall be in compliance with the Statewide Fire Prevention Code (§

27-94

et seq.)”; and added subsection B.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 26, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “at least once” for “at least twice” in subsection A.

§ 22.1-137.3.
School safety procedures; emergency situations; annual training.

In addition to complying with the requirements for drills set forth in §§ 22.1-137, 22.1-137.1, and 22.1-137.2, each school board shall develop training on safety procedures in the event of an emergency situation on school property. Such training shall be delivered to each student and employee in each school at least once each school year.

History.

2019, cc. 61, 140.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 61 and 140, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education shall develop guidelines for the development and delivery of training required by this act.”

§ 22.1-138.
Minimum standards for public school buildings.

The Board of Education shall prescribe by regulation minimum standards for the erection of or addition to public school buildings governing instructional, operational, health and maintenance facilities where these are not specifically addressed in the Uniform Statewide Building Code (§

36-97

et seq.).

By July 1, 1994, every school building in operation in the Commonwealth shall be tested for radon pursuant to procedures established by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) for radon measurements in schools.School buildings and additions opened for operation after July 1, 1994, shall be tested for radon pursuant to such EPA procedures and regulations prescribed by the Board of Education pursuant to subsection A. Each school shall maintain files of its radon test results and make such files available for review. The division superintendent shall report radon test results to the Department of Health.

Each school board shall maintain a water management program for the prevention of Legionnaires’ disease at each public school building in the local school division. Each school board shall validate each water management program on at least an annual basis to maintain the health and decency of such buildings. Each public school shall maintain files related to its water management program, including the results of all validation and remediation activities, and make such files available for review.

Each local school board shall develop and implement a plan to test and, if necessary, a plan to remediate mold in public school buildings in accordance with guidance issued by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. Each local school board shall (i) submit such testing plan and report the results of any test performed in accordance with such plan to the Department of Health and (ii) take all steps necessary to notify school staff and the parents of all enrolled students if testing results indicate the presence of mold in a public school building at or above the minimum level that raises a concern for the health of building occupants, as determined by the Department of Health.

Each school board shall, in consultation with the local building official and the state or local fire marshal, develop a procurement plan to ensure that all security enhancements to public school buildings are in compliance with the Uniform Statewide Building Code (§

36-97

et seq.) and Statewide Fire Prevention Code (§

27-94

et seq.).

No school employee shall open or close an electronic room partition in any school building unless (i) no student is present in such building, (ii) (a) no student is present in the room or area in which such partition is located and (b) such room or area is locked or otherwise inaccessible to students, or (iii) such partition includes a safety sensor that automatically stops the partition when a body passes between the leading edge and a wall, an opposing partition, or the stacking area.Any annual safety review or exercise for school employees in a local school division shall include information and demonstrations, as appropriate, regarding the provisions of this subsection.The Department of Education shall make available to each school board model safety guidance regarding the operation of electronic room partitions.

History.

1980, c. 559; 1993, c. 765; 2019, cc. 121, 369; 2020, cc. 776, 780.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 776, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Education shall make recommendations for the establishment, maintenance, and validation of water management programs to prevent Legionella pneumophila growth in public school buildings and shall notify each local school board of its recommendations no later than July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, c. 776, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, c. 780, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Health shall determine the minimum level of mold in a school building that raises a concern for the health of building occupants for the purpose of a school board’s notification of school staff and the parents of enrolled students in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2020, c. 780, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 121 added subsection C.

The 2019 amendment by c. 369 added subsections C through E, which were subsequently redesignated as subsections D through F at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 776, effective July 1, 2021, inserted subsection C, and redesignated the remaining subsections; updated an internal reference; and made stylistic changes. The section has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2020 amendment by c. 780, effective July 1, 2021, inserted subsection C, and redesignated the remaining subsections; updated an internal reference; and made stylistic changes. Subsection C was redesignated as subsection D at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 22.1-138.1.
School maintenance program established.

In compliance with the provisions of the appropriation act relating to the maintenance supplement program and with such funds as are appropriated for such purpose, each school board shall establish a program for ongoing school maintenance needs.

History.

1998, c. 73.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Maintenance and management of school buildings. —

Counterclaim for fraud in the inducement asserted by a contractor against a school board, pursuant to a contract between the parties for the renovation of a school building, was barred by the school board’s sovereign immunity as the governmental duties stated in §§ 22.1-135 through 22.1-140 explicitly included the maintenance and management of school buildings. Alexandria City Sch. Bd. v. Fox-Seko Constr., Inc., 74 Va. Cir. 92, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 256 (Alexandria July 27, 2007).

§ 22.1-138.2.
Certain public school buildings; carbon monoxide detectors.

Each public school building that was built before 2015 and that houses any classroom for students shall be equipped with at least one carbon monoxide detector.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 165.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 165, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of § 63.2-1705.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, (i) shall not become effective unless the provisions of Chapter 14.1 (§ 22.1-289.02 et seq.) of Title 22.1 of the Code of Virginia, except for § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, become effective on a date subsequent to July 1, 2021, and (ii) shall expire upon the effective date of such provisions of Chapter 14.1 of Title 22.1 of the Code of Virginia.” The § 63.2-1705.2 created by this act. never took effect as Chapter 14 (§ 22.1-289.02 et seq.) became effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.

§ 22.1-138.3.
Department; school division maintenance reserve tool.

The Department, in consultation with the Department of General Services, shall develop or adopt and maintain a data collection tool to assist each school board to determine the relative age of each public school building in the local school division and the amount of maintenance reserve funds that are necessary to restore each such building.

Each school board shall provide to the Department in a timely fashion the local data that is necessary to ensure that the tool maintained pursuant to subsection A remains relevant and useful for the determination of maintenance reserve needs.

History.

2022, c. 650.

Editor's Notes.

Act
2022, c. 650, cl. 2 provides “That the Department of Education shall consider using the Department of General Services' Real Estate and Assets Management system for tracking buildings and infrastructure maintenance status to meet the requirements of
§ 22.1-138.3 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act.”

§ 22.1-139.
Repealed by Acts 2010, c. 61, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-139, requiring notice to State Superintendent of proposed expenditures, was derived from Code 1950, § 22-166.2; 1952, c. 606; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-140.
Plans for buildings to be approved by division superintendent.

No public school building or addition or alteration thereto, for either permanent or temporary use, shall be advertised for bid, contracted for, erected, or otherwise acquired until the plans and specifications therefor (i) have been approved in writing by the division superintendent; (ii) are accompanied by a statement by an architect or professional engineer licensed by the Board for Architects, Professional Engineers, Land Surveyors, Certified Interior Designers and Landscape Architects that such plans and specifications are, in his professional opinion and belief, in compliance with the regulations of the Board of Education and the Uniform Statewide Building Code; and (iii) have been reviewed by an individual or entity with professional expertise in building security and crime prevention through building design. The division superintendent’s approval, architect’s or engineer’s statement, all reviewers’ comments, and a copy of the final plans and specifications shall be submitted to the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-97, 22-152, 22-153; 1954, cc. 257, 291; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1968, c. 501; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 161; 1975, cc. 308, 328; 1978, c. 430; 1980, c. 559; 1991, c. 550; 1993, c. 227; 1998, c. 27; 2019, c. 226.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 226 inserted “(i)” and “(ii)” and added clause (iii) in the first sentence and inserted “all reviewers’ comments” in the second sentence.

§ 22.1-141.
Repealed by Acts 1982, c. 647.

Cross references.

As to procurement by state and local governing bodies and governmental agencies, see §

2.2-4300

et seq.